Massachusetts, session 194th, H1784.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 26C of chapter 265 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended, in line 2, by inserting after the word “invite” the following words:-
“by any means, including but not limited to: personal contact, postal mail, telephone,
instant electronic messaging and electronic mail.”
of 1